Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201944-5002
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) For a child impacted by hearing loss, his or her ability to develop language can be improved by the consistent use of a hearing aid;

(2) Private insurance benefits for children's hearing aids will ultimately provide long-term savings to the State of Nebraska by decreasing the need for special education services and increasing the academic success of children impacted by hearing loss; and

(3) In the long-term, implementation of the Children of Nebraska Hearing Aid Act will allow those impacted by the act to be more competitive in the workforce and less dependent on assistance from the state and federal governments.

Laws 2019, LB15, § 2.